California, session 20252026, AB1894.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2302.5 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:2302.5. (a) The Legislature finds and declares that the regulation, control, management, and eradication of invasive mussels, including, but not limited to, Dreissena rostriformis bugensis, commonly known as quagga mussels, Dreissena polymorpha, commonly known as zebra mussels, and Limnoperna fortunei, commonly known as golden mussels, is a matter of statewide concern.(b) Imported water deliveries for groundwater replenishment made in compliance with an invasive mussel control plan approved by the department pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2301 shall not be prohibited by a public agency due to invasive mussels unless there is substantial, documented evidence of a proven health and safety risk as a result of the invasive mussels.(c) For purposes of this section, “imported water deliveries for groundwater replenishment” means deliveries of water imported from outside a region’s local watershed or natural boundary, primarily originating from the State Water Project, the Colorado River, or the Eastern Sierra, where the water is to be used for managed aquifer recharge, groundwater injection, spreading, percolation, or other activities intended to replenish groundwater supplies. For purposes of this definition, “water” includes, but is not limited to, surface water conveyed by an aqueduct, canal, pipeline, or other conveyance.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act adding Section 2302.5 to the Fish and Game Code addresses a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, Section 1 of this act applies to all cities and counties, including charter cities and charter counties.